District of Columbia statutes.
11-1918

Effect of invalidity.

If any provision of this Act [chapter] or the application of that provision is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect any other provision or application of this Act [chapter] which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

Nov. 14, 1986, 100 Stat. 3635, Pub. L. 99-650, § 2
The bracketed word “chapter” was inserted by the editor.
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 11-1901.
1981 Ed., § 11-1918.